Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 13.2. Standards of Quality.
§ 22.1-253.13:2.
(For Expiration Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Standard 2. Instructional, administrative, and support personnel.

The Board shall establish requirements for the licensing of teachers, principals, superintendents, and other professional personnel.

School boards shall employ licensed instructional personnel qualified in the relevant subject areas.

Each school board shall assign licensed instructional personnel in a manner that produces divisionwide ratios of students in average daily membership to full-time equivalent teaching positions, excluding special education teachers, principals, assistant principals, school counselors or certain other licensed individuals as set forth in subdivision H 4, and librarians, that are not greater than the following ratios: (i) 24 to one in kindergarten with no class being larger than 29 students; if the average daily membership in any kindergarten class exceeds 24 pupils, a full-time teacher’s aide shall be assigned to the class; (ii) 24 to one in grades one, two, and three with no class being larger than 30 students; (iii) 25 to one in grades four through six with no class being larger than 35 students; and (iv) 24 to one in English classes in grades six through 12. After September 30 of any school year, anytime the number of students in a class exceeds the class size limit established by this subsection, the local school division shall notify the parent of each student in such class of such fact no later than 10 days after the date on which the class exceeded the class size limit. Such notification shall state the reason that the class size exceeds the class size limit and describe the measures that the local school division will take to reduce the class size to comply with this subsection.

Within its regulations governing special education programs, the Board shall seek to set pupil/teacher ratios for pupils with intellectual disability that do not exceed the pupil/teacher ratios for self-contained classes for pupils with specific learning disabilities.

Further, school boards shall assign instructional personnel in a manner that produces schoolwide ratios of students in average daily memberships to full-time equivalent teaching positions of 21 to one in middle schools and high schools. School divisions shall provide all middle and high school teachers with one planning period per day or the equivalent, unencumbered of any teaching or supervisory duties.

Each local school board shall employ with state and local basic, special education, gifted, and career and technical education funds a minimum number of licensed, full-time equivalent instructional personnel for each 1,000 students in average daily membership (ADM) as set forth in the appropriation act.

In addition to the positions supported by basic aid and in support of regular school year programs of prevention, intervention, and remediation, state funding, pursuant to the appropriation act, shall be provided to fund certain full-time equivalent instructional positions for each 1,000 students in grades K through 12 who are identified as needing prevention, intervention, and remediation services. State funding for prevention, intervention, and remediation programs provided pursuant to this subsection and the appropriation act may be used to support programs for educationally at-risk students as identified by the local school boards.

To provide algebra readiness intervention services required by § 22.1-253.13:1, school divisions may employ mathematics teacher specialists to provide the required algebra readiness intervention services. School divisions using the Standards of Learning Algebra Readiness Initiative funding in this manner shall only employ instructional personnel licensed by the Board of Education.

In addition to the positions supported by basic aid and those in support of regular school year programs of prevention, intervention, and remediation, state funding, pursuant to the general appropriation act, shall be provided to support (i) 18.5 full-time equivalent instructional positions in the 2020-2021 school year for each 1,000 students identified as having limited English proficiency and (ii) 20 full-time equivalent instructional positions in the 2021-2022 school year and thereafter for each 1,000 students identified as having limited English proficiency, which positions may include dual language teachers who provide instruction in English and in a second language.

To provide flexibility in the instruction of English language learners who have limited English proficiency and who are at risk of not meeting state accountability standards, school divisions may use state and local funds from the Standards of Quality Prevention, Intervention, and Remediation account to employ additional English language learner teachers or dual language teachers to provide instruction to identified limited English proficiency students. Using these funds in this manner is intended to supplement the instructional services provided in this section. School divisions using the SOQ Prevention, Intervention, and Remediation funds in this manner shall employ only instructional personnel licensed by the Board of Education.

In addition to the full-time equivalent positions required elsewhere in this section, each local school board shall employ the following reading specialists in elementary schools, one full-time in each elementary school at the discretion of the local school board. One reading specialist employed by each local school board that employs a reading specialist shall have training in the identification of and the appropriate interventions, accommodations, and teaching techniques for students with dyslexia or a related disorder and shall serve as an advisor on dyslexia and related disorders. Such reading specialist shall have an understanding of the definition of dyslexia and a working knowledge of (i) techniques to help a student on the continuum of skills with dyslexia; (ii) dyslexia characteristics that may manifest at different ages and grade levels; (iii) the basic foundation of the keys to reading, including multisensory, explicit, systemic, and structured reading instruction; and (iv) appropriate interventions, accommodations, and assistive technology supports for students with dyslexia.To provide reading intervention services required by § 22.1-253.13:1, school divisions may employ reading specialists to provide the required reading intervention services. School divisions using the Early Reading Intervention Initiative funds in this manner shall employ only instructional personnel licensed by the Board of Education.

Each local school board shall employ, at a minimum, the following full-time equivalent positions for any school that reports fall membership, according to student enrollment:

Principals in elementary schools, one half-time to 299 students, one full-time at 300 students; principals in middle schools, one full-time, to be employed on a 12-month basis; principals in high schools, one full-time, to be employed on a 12-month basis;

Assistant principals in elementary schools, one half-time at 600 students, one full-time at 900 students; assistant principals in middle schools, one full-time for each 600 students; assistant principals in high schools, one full-time for each 600 students; and school divisions that employ a sufficient number of assistant principals to meet this staffing requirement may assign assistant principals to schools within the division according to the area of greatest need, regardless of whether such schools are elementary, middle, or secondary;

Librarians in elementary schools, one part-time to 299 students, one full-time at 300 students; librarians in middle schools, one-half time to 299 students, one full-time at 300 students, two full-time at 1,000 students; librarians in high schools, one half-time to 299 students, one full-time at 300 students, two full-time at 1,000 students. Local school divisions that employ a sufficient number of librarians to meet this staffing requirement may assign librarians to schools within the division according to the area of greatest need, regardless of whether such schools are elementary, middle, or secondary; and

School counselors, one full-time equivalent position per 325 students in grades kindergarten through 12.

However, in order to meet the staffing requirements set forth in this subdivision, any local school board (i) may employ, under a provisional license issued by the Department for three school years with an allowance for an additional two-year extension with the approval of the division superintendent, any professional counselor licensed by the Board of Counseling, clinical social worker licensed by the Board of Social Work, psychologist licensed by the Board of Psychology, or other licensed counseling professional with appropriate experience and training, provided that any such individual makes progress toward completing the requirements for full licensure as a school counselor during such period of employment or (ii) in the event that the school board does not receive any application from a licensed school counselor, professional counselor, clinical social worker, or psychologist or another licensed counseling professional with appropriate experience and training to fill a school counselor vacancy in the school division, may enter into an annual contract with another entity for the provision of school counseling services by a licensed professional counselor, clinical social worker, or psychologist or another licensed counseling professional with appropriate experience and training. Local school boards that employ a sufficient number of individuals to meet the staffing requirements set forth in this subdivision may assign such individuals to schools within the division according to the area of greatest need, regardless of whether such schools are elementary, middle, or high schools.

Local school boards shall employ five full-time equivalent positions per 1,000 students in grades kindergarten through five to serve as elementary resource teachers in art, music, and physical education.

Local school boards shall employ two full-time equivalent positions per 1,000 students in grades kindergarten through 12, one to provide technology support and one to serve as an instructional technology resource teacher.

To provide flexibility, school divisions may use the state and local funds for instructional technology resource teachers to employ a data coordinator position, an instructional technology resource teacher position, or a data coordinator/instructional resource teacher blended position. The data coordinator position is intended to serve as a resource to principals and classroom teachers in the area of data analysis and interpretation for instructional and school improvement purposes, as well as for overall data management and administration of state assessments. School divisions using these funds in this manner shall employ only instructional personnel licensed by the Board of Education.

Local school boards may employ additional positions that exceed these minimal staffing requirements. These additional positions may include, but are not limited to, those funded through the state’s incentive and categorical programs as set forth in the appropriation act.

A combined school, such as kindergarten through 12, shall meet at all grade levels the staffing requirements for the highest grade level in that school; this requirement shall apply to all staff, except for school counselors or certain other licensed individuals as set forth in subdivision H 4, and shall be based on the school’s total enrollment. The Board of Education may grant waivers from these staffing levels upon request from local school boards seeking to implement experimental or innovative programs that are not consistent with these staffing levels.

School boards shall, however, annually, on or before December 31, report to the public (i) the actual pupil/teacher ratios in elementary school classrooms in the local school division by school for the current school year; and (ii) the actual pupil/teacher ratios in middle school and high school in the local school division by school for the current school year. Actual pupil/teacher ratios shall include only the teachers who teach the grade and class on a full-time basis and shall exclude resource personnel. School boards shall report pupil/teacher ratios that include resource teachers in the same annual report. Any classes funded through the voluntary kindergarten through third grade class size reduction program shall be identified as such classes. Any classes having waivers to exceed the requirements of this subsection shall also be identified. Schools shall be identified; however, the data shall be compiled in a manner to ensure the confidentiality of all teacher and pupil identities.

Students enrolled in a public school on a less than full-time basis shall be counted in ADM in the relevant school division. Students who are either (i) enrolled in a nonpublic school or (ii) receiving home instruction pursuant to § 22.1-254.1, and who are enrolled in public school on a less than full-time basis in any mathematics, science, English, history, social science, career and technical education, fine arts, foreign language, or health education or physical education course shall be counted in the ADM in the relevant school division on a pro rata basis as provided in the appropriation act. Each such course enrollment by such students shall be counted as 0.25 in the ADM; however, no such nonpublic or home school student shall be counted as more than one-half a student for purposes of such pro rata calculation. Such calculation shall not include enrollments of such students in any other public school courses.

Each school board shall provide at least three specialized student support positions per 1,000 students. For purposes of this subsection, specialized student support positions include school social workers, school psychologists, school nurses, licensed behavior analysts, licensed assistant behavior analysts, and other licensed health and behavioral positions, which may either be employed by the school board or provided through contracted services.

Each local school board shall provide those support services that are necessary for the efficient and cost-effective operation and maintenance of its public schools.

For the purposes of this title, unless the context otherwise requires, “support services positions” shall include the following:

Executive policy and leadership positions, including school board members, superintendents and assistant superintendents;

Fiscal and human resources positions, including fiscal and audit operations;

Student support positions, including (i) social work administrative positions not included in subsection O; (ii) school counselor administrative positions not included in subdivision H 4; (iii) homebound administrative positions supporting instruction; (iv) attendance support positions related to truancy and dropout prevention; and (v) health and behavioral administrative positions not included in subsection O;

Instructional personnel support, including professional development positions and library and media positions not included in subdivision H 3;

Technology professional positions not included in subsection J;

Operation and maintenance positions, including facilities; pupil transportation positions; operation and maintenance professional and service positions; and security service, trade, and laborer positions;

Technical and clerical positions for fiscal and human resources, student support, instructional personnel support, operation and maintenance, administration, and technology; and

School-based clerical personnel in elementary schools; part-time to 299 students, one full-time at 300 students; clerical personnel in middle schools; one full-time and one additional full-time for each 600 students beyond 200 students and one full-time for the library at 750 students; clerical personnel in high schools; one full-time and one additional full-time for each 600 students beyond 200 students and one full-time for the library at 750 students. Local school divisions that employ a sufficient number of school-based clerical personnel to meet this staffing requirement may assign the clerical personnel to schools within the division according to the area of greatest need, regardless of whether such schools are elementary, middle, or secondary.

Pursuant to the appropriation act, support services shall be funded from basic school aid.

School divisions may use the state and local funds for support services to provide additional instructional services.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, when determining the assignment of instructional and other licensed personnel in subsections C through J, a local school board shall not be required to include full-time students of approved virtual school programs.

History.

1988, cc. 645, 682; 1991, c. 480; 1997, c. 828; 2004, cc. 939, 955; 2005, cc. 331, 450; 2010, cc. 537, 817; 2011, cc. 55, 74; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2013, cc. 123, 157, 158, 224; 2016, c. 646; 2017, cc. 321, 626, 629; 2018, c. 484; 2019, cc. 139, 796; 2020, cc. 582, 635, 952, 953, 1034, 1035; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 454; 2022, c. 205.

Subsection D set out twice.

The first version of subsection D above is effective until July 1, 2022. The second version of subsection D is effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” Funding was provided for subsections A through F, subsection I, and subsections L through P [now subsections K through O], except that the 21:1 ratio in the third paragraph of subsection C is funded for the second year only. Subsection G and subdivisions H 1 and 2, as added by Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, were not funded and are set out here as they read in former subsection B of § 22.1-253.13:3. Subdivisions H 3 through H 5 were funded. Subsection J, as set out above, was funded for only one position the first year and fully funded for the second year. Subsection K, as added by Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, was not funded and therefore is not set out in the section above. See Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

Acts 2017, c. 514, cl. 1 provides: “The Board of Education shall develop guidelines for training school counselors, school nurses, and other relevant school staff on the prevention of trafficking of children.”

Acts 2019, c. 770, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Education, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, including a parent of a currently-enrolled public school student diagnosed with dyslexia, shall develop a plan to implement a pilot program to incorporate additional diagnostic tools into reading diagnostic tests used for screening students in kindergarten through grade three. Such plan shall consider the appropriate interventions and services for students identified through such additional diagnostic tools and the resources that are necessary for the implementation of such interventions and services. The Department of Education shall submit such plan to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Education and Health, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance no later than December 1, 2019.”

Acts 2020, c. 582, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2022.”

Acts 2020, c. 582, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education shall adopt regulations establishing standards for accreditation that include a requirement that the standard school day for students in kindergarten average at least 5.5 instructional hours in order to qualify for full accreditation. The Board of Education shall adopt such regulations by July 1, 2022.”

Acts 2020, c. 952, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed in 2020 by the General Assembly that becomes law.” However, Acts 2020, c. 953, which is identical, contains no clause 2.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 145 B 7 g, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection H of § 22.1-253.13:2, Code of Virginia, each school board shall employ the following full-time equivalent school counselor positions for any school that reports fall membership, according to the type of school and student enrollment: in elementary schools, one hour per day per 91 students, one full-time at 455 students, one hour per day additional time per 91 students or major fraction thereof; in middle schools, one period per 74 students, one full-time at 370 students, one additional period per 74 students or major fraction thereof; in high schools, one period per 65 students, one full-time at 325 students, one additional period per 65 students or major fraction thereof.’

“2)
Effective with the 2021-2022 school year, local school boards shall employ one fulltime equivalent school counselor position per 325 students in grades kindergarten through 12.”

Acts
2022, cc. 549 and
550, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and rewrote the section. For effective date, see note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 331 and 450 are identical, and substituted “pupils with mental retardation” for “educable mentally retarded (EMR) pupils” in the next-to-last paragraph of subsection C; substituted “enrollment” for “employment” in subsection H; inserted “full-time equivalent” in subsections I and J and deleted “(See Editor’s note)” at the beginning of subsection J; and substituted “appropriation act” for “appropriations act” in the last paragraph of subsection O.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 537 and 817 are identical, and added subsection P.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 55 and 74 are identical, and in subsections E, F, G and J, added the last paragraph; in subdivision H 2, added the language beginning “and school divisions that employ a sufficient number of assistant principals to meet this staffing requirement”; deleted subdivision H 5, which concerned number of clerical personnel per students; and rewrote subsection O.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in the second paragraph of subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 123 and 157 are identical, and rewrote the first sentence of the second paragraphs of subsections E and G.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 158 and 224 are identical, and added the second sentence of subdivisions H 3, H 4 and O 8.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 646 added the second and third sentences in subsection C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 321, in subsection M, rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read “School boards shall, however, annually, on or before January 1, report to the public the actual pupil/teacher ratios in elementary school classrooms by school for the current school year” and substituted “Actual pupil/teacher” for “Such actual” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 626 and 629 are identical, and added the last two sentences in the first paragraph of subsection G.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 484, in subsection F, added “which positions may include dual language teachers who provide instruction in English and in a second language” at the end of the first paragraph, and inserted “or dual language teachers” in the second paragraph.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 139 substituted “school counselors” for “guidance counselors” throughout; in subsection C, inserted “school” preceding “counselors”; and in subdivision O 3, substituted “school counselor administrative” for “guidance administrative.”

The 2019 amendment by c. 796, substituted “school counselors” for “guidance counselors” throughout; in the first paragraph of subsection C, inserted “school” preceding “counselors, and”; rewrote subdivisions H 4, which read: “Guidance counselors in elementary schools, one hour per day per 100 students, one full-time at 500 students, one hour per day additional time per 100 students or major fraction thereof; guidance counselors in middle schools, one period per 80 students, one full-time at 400 students, one additional period per 80 students or major fraction thereof; guidance counselors in high schools, one period per 70 students, one full-time at 350 students, one additional period per 70 students or major fraction thereof. Local school divisions that employ a sufficient number of guidance counselors to meet this staffing requirement may assign guidance counselors to schools within the division according to the area of greatest need, regardless of whether such schools are elementary, middle, or secondary”; and in subdivision O 3, substituted “school counselor” for “guidance.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 582, effective July 1, 2022, deleted “Calculations of kindergarten positions shall be based on full-day kindergarten programs. Beginning with the March 31 report of average daily membership, those school divisions offering half-day kindergarten with pupil/teacher ratios that exceed 30 to one shall adjust their average daily membership for kindergarten to reflect 85 percent of the total kindergarten average daily memberships, as provided in the appropriation act” from subsection D at the end.

The 2020 amendment by c. 635, in subdivision O 3, inserted “licensed behavior analysts, licensed assistant behavior analysts” in clause (v) and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 952 and 953 are identical, and in subdivision H 4 a, substituted “2020-2021” for “2019-2020,” inserted subdivision H 4 b and redesignated accordingly.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1034 and 1035 are identical, and in subsection F, substituted “(i) 18.5 full-time equivalent instructional positions in the 2020-2021 school year for each 1,000 students identified as having limited English proficiency and (ii) 20 full-time equivalent instructional positions in the 2021-2022 school year and thereafter” for “17 full-time equivalent instructional positions.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 454, effective July 1, 2021, added new subsection O and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; and in subdivision P 3 in clause (i), deleted “social workers and” at the beginning and added “not included in subsection O,” and in clause (v), inserted “administrative” and substituted “not included in subsection O” for “including licensed behavior analysts, licensed assistant behavior analysts, school nurses, and school psychologists.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 205 inserted “or certain other licensed individuals as set forth in subdivision H 4” in subsection C in the first paragraph; deleted “the type of school and” preceding “student enrollment” in the subsection H in the introductory language; rewrote subdivision H 4 dealing with school counselors; in subsection L in the first sentence, inserted “or certain other licensed individuals as set forth in subdivision H 4” and deleted “school counselor staff requirements shall, however, be based on the enrollment at the various school organization levels, i.e., elementary, middle, or high school” at the end; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 549 and 550 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection G, rewrote the first sentence, which read: “In addition to the full-time equivalent positions required elsewhere in this section, each local school board shall employ the following reading specialists in elementary schools, one full-time in each elementary school at the discretion of the local school board.” and rewrote the second sentence, which read: “One reading specialist employed by each local school board that employs a reading specialist shall have training in the identification of and the appropriate interventions, accommodations, and teaching techniques for students with dyslexia or a related disorder and shall serve as an advisor on dyslexia and related disorders.”